Virginia statutes. Title 2.2. Administration of Government.
Article 2.
Commercial Space Flight Authority.

§ 2.2-2201. Short title; definitions.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Virginia Commercial Space Flight Authority Act".

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

"Project"
means the construction, improvement, furnishing, maintenance, acquisition or operation of any facility or the provision for or funding of any activity that will further the purposes described in §

2.2-2202

.

(1995, c. 758, §§ 9-266.1, 9-266.2; 2001, c. 844.)

§ 2.2-2202. Declaration of public purpose; Authority created.

The General Assembly has determined that there exists in the Commonwealth a need to (i) disseminate knowledge pertaining to scientific and technological research and development among public and private entities, including but not limited to knowledge in the area of commercial space flight, and (ii) promote industrial and economic development. In order to facilitate and coordinate scientific and technological research and development and to promote the industrial and economic development of the Commonwealth, which purposes are declared to be public purposes.

To achieve the objectives of subsection A, there is created a political subdivision of the Commonwealth to be known as the "Virginia Commercial Space Flight Authority" (the "Authority"). The Authority's exercise of powers conferred by this article shall be deemed to be the performance of an essential governmental function and matters of public necessity for which public moneys may be spent and private property acquired.

(1995, c. 758, § 9-266.3; 2001, c. 844.)

§ 2.2-2203. Board of directors; members and officers; Executive Director.

The Authority shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of 13 members, four of whom shall be the President of the Center for Innovative Technology, the President of Old Dominion University, the Secretary of Commerce and Trade, and the Secretary of Technology, who shall serve as members of the Board for terms coincident with their terms of office. The remaining nine members shall be appointed by the Governor as follows: four members representing the commercial space flight industry; two members representing the telecommunications industry; one member representing the County of Accomack, one member representing the County of Northampton, and one at-large member. Of the members appointed by the Governor, two shall be appointed for terms of one year, three for terms of two years, and three for terms of three years, from the effective date of their appointment. Thereafter, the members of the Board shall be appointed for terms of three years. All members of the Board appointed by the Governor shall be confirmed by each house of the General Assembly. Vacancies in the membership of the Board shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired portion of the term. Members of the Board shall be subject to removal from office in like manner as are state, county, town and district officers under the provisions of §§

24.2-230

through

24.2-238

. Immediately after appointment, the members of the Board shall enter upon the performance of their duties.

The Board shall annually elect one of its members as chairman and another as vice-chairman, a secretary, and a treasurer who need not be a member of the Board. The Board may also elect other subordinate officers, who need not be members of the Board, as it deems proper. The chairman or, in his absence, the vice-chairman shall preside at all meetings of the Board. In the absence of both the chairman and vice-chairman, the Board shall appoint a chairman pro tempore, who shall preside at such meetings. Seven members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the Authority's business, and no vacancy in the membership shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the Authority.

The members of the Board shall be entitled to reimbursement for their reasonable travel, meal and lodging expenses incurred in attending the meetings of the Board or while otherwise engaged in the discharge of their duties. Such expenses shall be paid out of the treasury of the Authority upon vouchers signed by the chairman of the Board or by such other person designated by the Board for this purpose.

The Board may employ an Executive Director of the Authority, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Board, to direct the day-to-day operations and activities of the Authority and carry out the powers and duties conferred upon him by the Board. The Executive Director and employees of the Authority shall be compensated in the manner provided by the Board and shall not be subject to the provisions of the Virginia Personnel Act (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) of this title.

(1995, c. 758, § 9-266.4; 1999, cc. 412, 421, 433; 2001, c. 844; 2009, c. 82.)

The 2009 amendments.

- The 2009 amendment by c. 82, in the first paragraph, substituted "13 members" for "twelve members" in the first sentence, and in the second sentence substituted "nine members" for "eight members" and "four members" for "three members."

§ 2.2-2204. Powers of the Authority.

The Authority is granted all powers necessary or convenient for the carrying out of its statutory purposes, including, but not limited to, the power to:

Sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, complain and defend in all courts;

Adopt, use, and alter at will a common seal;

Acquire any project and property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein, by purchase, gift or devise and to sell, lease (whether as lessor or lessee), transfer, convey or dispose of any project or property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible or any interest therein, at any time acquired or held by the Authority on such terms and conditions as may be determined by the Board;

Plan, develop, undertake, carry out, construct, equip, improve, rehabilitate, repair, furnish, maintain and operate projects;

Adopt bylaws for the management and regulation of its affairs;

Fix, alter, charge and collect rates, rentals, fees, and other charges for the use of projects of, the sale of products of, or services rendered by the Authority at rates to be determined by it for the purpose of providing for the payment of the expenses of the Authority; the planning, development, construction, improvement, rehabilitation, repair, furnishing, maintenance, and operation of its projects and properties; the payment of the costs accomplishing its purposes set forth in §

2.2-2202

; the payment of the principal of and interest on its obligations; and the creation of reserves for such purposes, for other purposes of the Authority and to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing and operating any project and fulfilling the terms and provisions of any agreements made with the purchasers or holders of any such obligations;

Borrow money, make and issue bonds including bonds as the Authority may determine to issue for the purpose of accomplishing the purposes set forth in §

2.2-2202

or for refunding bonds previously issued by the Authority, whether such outstanding bonds have matured or are then subject to redemption, or any combination of such purposes; secure the payment of all bonds, or any part thereof, by pledge, assignment or deed of trust of all or any of its revenues, rentals, and receipts or of any project or property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any rights and interest therein; make such agreements with the purchasers or holders of such bonds or with others in connection with any such bonds, whether issued or to be issued, as the Authority shall deem advisable; and in general to provide for the security for said bonds and the rights of holders thereof;

Make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties, the furtherance of its purposes and the execution of its powers under this article, including interstate compacts and agreements with any person or federal agency;

Employ, in its discretion, consultants, attorneys, architects, engineers, accountants, financial experts, investment bankers, superintendents, managers and such other employees and agents as may be necessary, and to fix their compensation to be payable from funds made available to the Authority;

Receive and accept from any federal or private agency, foundation, corporation, association or person grants, donations of money, real or personal property for the benefit of the Authority, and to receive and accept from the Commonwealth or any state, and any municipality, county or other political subdivision thereof and from any other source, aid or contributions of either money, property, or other things of value, to be held, used and applied for the purposes for which such grants and contributions may be made;

Render advice and assistance, and to provide services, to institutions of higher education including, but not limited to, Old Dominion University, and to other persons providing services or facilities for scientific and technological research or graduate education, provided that credit toward a degree, certificate or diploma shall be granted only if such education is provided in conjunction with an institution of higher education authorized to operate in Virginia;

Develop, undertake and provide programs, alone or in conjunction with any person or federal agency, for scientific and technological research, technology management, continuing education and in-service training; however, credit towards a degree, certificate or diploma shall be granted only if such education is provided in conjunction with an institution of higher education authorized to operate in Virginia; foster the utilization of scientific and technological research, information discoveries and data and obtain patents, copyrights and trademarks thereon; coordinate the scientific and technological research efforts of public institutions and private industry and collect and maintain data on the development and utilization of scientific and technological research capabilities;

Pledge or otherwise encumber all or any of the revenues or receipts of the Authority as security for all or any of the obligations of the Authority;

Appoint an industry advisory board to advise the Authority on issues related to the performance of its duties, the furtherance of its purposes and the execution of its powers under this article. The Authority shall have full discretion in determining the number and qualifications of members it appoints to the industry advisory board, and whether such members shall be compensated from the funds made available to the Authority; and

Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers granted to it by law.

(1995, c. 758, § 9-266.5; 1996, c. 111; 2001, c. 844.)